Nebraska, session 109, LB432.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB432 LB432
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 11 of this act:
(1) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(2) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(3) Lethal injection means intravenous injection of a substance or
substances in a quantity sufficient to cause death; and
(4) Nitrogen hypoxia means inhalation of pure nitrogen for a
sufficient time to cause death.
Sec. 2. Section 83-964, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-964 A sentence of death shall be enforced by either lethal
injection or nitrogen hypoxia, with the method to be determined by the
department the intravenous injection of a substance or substances in a
quantity sufficient to cause death. The execution shall be carried out
lethal substance or substances shall be administered in compliance with
an execution protocol created and maintained by the department Department
of Correctional Services.
Sec. 3. Section 83-965, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-965 (1) A sentence of death shall be enforced by the director
Director of Correctional Services. Upon receipt of an execution warrant,
the director shall proceed at the time named in the warrant to enforce
the sentence, unless the director is informed that enforcement of the
sentence has been stayed by competent judicial authority, the sentence
has been commuted, or the conviction has been pardoned.
(2) The director shall create, modify, and maintain a written
execution protocol describing the process and procedures by which an
execution will be carried out consistent with this section. The director
shall (a) select the substance or substances to be employed in an
execution by lethal injection, (b) select the equipment to be employed in
an execution by nitrogen hypoxia, (c) create a documented process for
obtaining the necessary substances or equipment, (d) (c) designate an
-2-

LB432 LB432
2025 2025
execution team composed of one or more executioners and any other
personnel deemed necessary to effectively and securely conduct an
execution, (e) (d) describe the respective responsibilities of each
member of the execution team, (f) (e) describe the training required of
each member of the execution team, and (g) (f) perform or authorize any
other details deemed necessary and appropriate by the director.
(3) For an execution by lethal injection, the The execution protocol
shall require that the first or only substance injected be capable of
rendering the convicted person unconscious and that a determination
sufficient to reasonably verify that the convicted person is unconscious
be made before the administration of any additional substances, if any.
Sec. 4. Section 83-966, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-966 Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(1) Any prescription, preparation, compounding, dispensing,
obtaining, or administration of the substances or equipment deemed
necessary to perform an execution by a lethal injection or nitrogen
hypoxia shall not constitute the practice of medicine or any other
profession relating to health care which is subject by law to regulation,
licensure, or certification;
(2) A pharmacist or pharmaceutical supplier may dispense the
designated substances, without a prescription, to the director Director
of Correctional Services or the director's designee upon production of a
written request from the director for the designated substances necessary
to conduct an execution;
(3) Obtaining, preparing, compounding, dispensing, and administering
the substance or substances designated by the execution protocol does not
violate the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or sections 71-2501 to
71-2512; and
(4) If a person who is a member of the execution team is licensed by
a board or department, the licensing board or department shall not
-3-

LB432 LB432
2025 2025
censure, reprimand, suspend, revoke, or take any other disciplinary
action against that person's license as a result of that person's
participation in a court-ordered execution.
Sec. 5. For an execution by lethal injection, the director may
designate any person qualified under the terms of the execution protocol
to administer to the convicted person the substances necessary to comply
with the execution protocol.
Sec. 6. Section 83-967, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-967 (1) The Director of Correctional Services may designate any
person qualified under the terms of the execution protocol to administer
to the convicted person the substances necessary to comply with the
execution protocol.
(2) The identity of all members of the execution team, and any
information reasonably calculated to lead to the identity of such
members, shall be confidential and exempt from disclosure pursuant to
sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 and shall not be subject to discovery or
introduction as evidence in any civil proceeding unless extraordinary
good cause is shown and a protective order is issued by a district court
limiting dissemination of such information.
Sec. 7. Section 83-968, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-968 No death sentence shall be voided or reduced as a result of a
determination that a method of execution was declared unconstitutional
under the Constitution of Nebraska or the Constitution of the United
States. In any case in which an execution method is declared
unconstitutional, the death sentence shall remain in force until the
sentence can be lawfully executed by any valid method of execution.
Sec. 8. Section 83-969, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-969 When any convicted person is sentenced to death, such
-4-

LB432 LB432
2025 2025
punishment shall be inflicted at a department Department of Correctional
Services facility under the supervision of the director Director of
Correctional Services and in such a manner as to exclude the view of all
persons except those permitted to be present as provided in sections 9
and 10 of this act 83-970 and 83-971.
Sec. 9. Section 83-970, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-970 Besides the director Director of Correctional Services and
those persons required to be present under the execution protocol, the
following persons, and no others, except as provided in section 10 of
this act 83-971, may be present at the execution: (1) The member of the
clergy in attendance upon the convicted person; (2) no more than three
persons selected by the convicted person; (3) no more than three persons
representing the victim or victims of the crime; and (4) such other
persons, not exceeding six in number, as the director may designate. At
least two persons designated by the director shall be professional
members of the Nebraska news media.
Sec. 10. Section 83-971, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-971 Whenever the director Director of Correctional Services shall
deem the presence of a military force necessary to carry into effect the
provisions of sections 2 and 8 of this act 83-964 and 83-969, he or she
shall make the fact known to the Governor of the state, who may is hereby
authorized to call out so much of the military force of the state as in
his or her judgment may be necessary for the purpose.
Sec. 11. Section 83-972, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-972 Whenever the director inflicts Director of Correctional
Services shall inflict the punishment of death upon a convicted person,
in obedience to the command of the court, he or she shall make return of
his or her proceedings as soon as may be to the clerk of the court where
-5-

LB432 LB432
2025 2025
the conviction was had, and the clerk shall subjoin the return to the
record of conviction and sentence.
Sec. 12. Original sections 83-964, 83-965, 83-966, 83-967, 83-968,
83-969, 83-970, 83-971, and 83-972, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
are repealed.
-6-